Louisiana, session 2026, SB119.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:90(F) and 90.3(L) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§90. Gambling
* * *
F. The purchase of lottery tickets through the internet, as provided in
R.S. 47:9008, shall not be considered gambling for the purposes of this Section.
* * *
§90.3. Gambling by computer
* * *
L. The purchase of lottery tickets through the internet, as provided in
R.S. 47:9008, shall not be considered gambling by computer for the purposes of
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-335 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 119
this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 47:9008(A)(9) is hereby amended and reenacted and 9002(31) and
9008(B) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9002. Definitions
As used in this Subtitle, the following words and phrases shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
* * *
(31) "I lottery" means the purchase of lottery tickets through the
internet.
* * *
§9008. Board; lottery games; regulation
A. The board may adopt rules for the conduct of specific lottery games and
operations, including but not limited to rules specifying:
* * *
(9) Any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and effective
operation of the lottery or for the convenience of the public, including the purchase
of lottery tickets through the internet.
B. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement, administer, and regulate the purchase of lottery
tickets through the internet, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Requiring age verification methods that prohibit persons under the
age of twenty-one from purchasing lottery tickets through the internet.
(2) Requiring location verification methods that restrict the purchase of
lottery tickets through the internet to individuals physically located within the
state of Louisiana.
* * *
Section 3. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the definitions in R.S. 47:9002 to ensure the definitions are in alphabetical order.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-335 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 119